Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.811

Authority to adopt rules.

The secretary of state has the power and authority reasonably necessary for the efficient and effective administration of this chapter, including the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2015 c 188 s 103.]